Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-804
Business of corporations or other companies; conduct; investigation by Attorney General; powers.

The Attorney General of this state may at any time require of any corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association engaged in business within this state, any statement he or she may think fit in regard to the conduct of its business. He or she may especially require any such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association to give a list of all contracts or transactions entered into within the twelve months preceding such requisition in which it has sold any article or product or carried any article or product within this state at a rate less than the ordinary market price if such article or product has been sold or carried by any other person than the party to such transaction. He or she may further require the reasons for such distinction and the circumstances attending the same.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 5, p. 638;

R.S.1913, § 4049;

C.S.1922, § 3452;

C.S.1929, § 59-805;

Laws 1939, c. 76, § 1, p. 312;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 59-805;

R.S.1943, § 59-804;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 359.

The purpose of requiring statements to be filed with the Attorney General is to aid him in enforcing the Junkin Act. State v. American Surety Co., 91 Neb. 22, 135 N.W. 365, Ann. Cas. 1913B 973 (1912).